Georgia, session 2025_26, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Farmstead Relief Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to standards,
labeling, and adulteration of food, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
H. B. 228
- 1 -

LC 44 2892
"ARTICLE 19
26-2-500.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Commissioner' means the Commissioner of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.
(2) 'Department' means the Department of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.
(3) 'Farmstead' is any place or premises where one or more lactating animals, such as
cows, goats, and sheep, are kept for milking purposes, and from which a part or all of the
milk produced by the resident lactating animals is processed in an on-site farmstead
manufacturing plant to manufacture farmstead products.
(4) 'Farmstead manufacturing plant' is a facility located on a farmstead in which
farmstead milk is pasteurized and used to make farmstead products.
(5) 'Farmstead milk' is milk produced by farmstead lactating animals which is
pasteurized and processed in a farmstead manufacturing plant to manufacture farmstead
products.
(6) 'Farmstead products' are dairy products, including cheese, butter, and ice cream,
made in a farmstead manufacturing plant for human consumption. Farmstead products
are limited to class II-IV dairy products as defined by the Federal Milk Order System of
the United States Department of Agriculture.
26-2-501.
Farmstead products which are in compliance with this article and in compliance with the
rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article may be sold, offered for sale, or
delivered to the consuming public for the purpose of human consumption.
H. B. 228
- 2 -

LC 44 2892
26-2-502.
All farmstead manufacturing plants must have a valid dairy manufacturer's license issued
by the department.
26-2-503.
No license or permit shall be required for a farmstead.
26-2-504.
(a) The Commissioner is charged with the responsibility of enforcing this article.
(b) It shall be the duty of the Commissioner or his or her authorized food safety division
representative:
(1) To inspect or cause to be inspected the farmstead manufacturing plant at the time of
licensure, annually thereafter, and in the event of concerns about the safety of farmstead
products produced by the farmstead manufacturing plant;
(2) To prohibit the production, sale, or distribution of unclean or unwholesome farmstead
products;
(3) To condemn for food purposes all unclean or unwholesome farmstead products,
wherever found;
(4) To take samples anywhere of farmstead products and cause the same to be analyzed
or satisfactorily tested;
(5) To inspect and make tests of any instrument or equipment used in the production of
farmstead products; and
(6) To compile and publish in print or electronically annually, or at such shorter intervals
as he or she may desire, statistics and information concerning farmsteads in this state.
H. B. 228
- 3 -

LC 44 2892
26-2-505.
The Commissioner shall have the power to adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations
to implement and enforce this article; provided, however, that all rules and regulations shall
be of uniform application; and provided, further, that all rules and regulations shall be
adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia
Administrative Procedure Act.' The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited
to, the following:
(1) Rules and regulations to provide for the labeling of farmstead products; and
(2) Rules and regulations to prescribe the specifications of all equipment used in the
production of farmstead products and instruments that may be used in the testing of
farmstead milk used in the production of farmstead products, except as otherwise
specified by this article.
26-2-506.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any farmstead manufacturing plant that does not possess a dairy
manufacturer's license from the department to manufacture or sell farmstead products.
(b) Licenses shall not be transferable to other persons or locations.
(c) Applications for all licenses provided for in this article shall be made to the
Commissioner on such forms as he or she may prescribe. The Commissioner may deny,
refuse, suspend, or revoke any license, after notice and a hearing, for any violation of or
failure to comply with this article or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder;
provided, however, that the hearing shall be held in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50,
the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.'
26-2-507.
(a) All farmstead products shall be packaged and sealed at the same location where
produced.
H. B. 228
- 4 -

LC 44 2892
(b) All containers and packages enclosing farmstead products shall be labeled in
accordance with the applicable requirements of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act,
as amended, the federal Nutrition Labeling and Education Act (NLEA) of 1990 and
regulations developed thereunder, and the Code of Federal Regulations and shall comply
with the applicable requirements of this article.
26-2-508.
(a) Samples of farmstead milk and farmstead products shall be collected by the department
and tested prior to a dairy manufacturer's license being issued to the farmstead
manufacturing plant.
(b) The farmstead shall provide to the department satisfactory testing results prior to:
(1) The farmstead manufacturing plant receiving a dairy manufacturer's license and
beginning production or distribution; or
(2) Reinstatement of a dairy manufacturer's license to a farmstead manufacturing plant
that has been suspended.
(c) Samples of farmstead milk and farmstead products, except as otherwise specified by
100 this article, may be taken for scientific examination for public health purposes, at any
101 reasonable time or place, and examined bacteriologically or for any other public health
102 reason by agents of the department. On a schedule or at times to be determined by the
103 department, such samples are to be collected by the farmstead and farmstead manufacturing
104 plant, properly packaged in prepaid parcels provided by the department and submitted to
105 a designated testing facility by overnight mail.
106 26-2-509.
107 All farmstead milk used in the production of farmstead products shall be pasteurized. No
108 raw milk pursuant to Article 18 of this chapter shall be used in the production of farmstead
109 products. Farmstead milk shall, except as otherwise specified in this article, meet the
H. B. 228
- 5 -

LC 44 2892
110 requirements of milk for manufacturing purposes as defined by the United States
111 Department of Agriculture.
112 26-2-510.
113 Farmsteads located in regions determined by the U.S. Department of Agriculture's Animal
114 and Plant Health Inspection Service to be free of brucellosis and tuberculosis whose
115 lactating animals, including cows, goats, and sheep, are used to produce farmstead milk to
116 be used to make farmstead products shall be exempt from any brucellosis and tuberculosis
117 testing requirements.
118 26-2-511.
119 Farmsteads shall be exempt from all mandatory testing of milk for manufacturing purposes
120 except:
121 (1) The appearance and odor test; and
122 (2) Testing for antibiotic residues. Farmsteads shall be responsible for conducting,
123 performing, and recording the testing of farmstead milk prior to pasteurization and use
124 in the manufacture of farmstead products.
125 26-2-512.
126 (a) The Commissioner shall be charged with the enforcement of this article and shall have
127 the power and authority, in connection with this and other provisions dealing with food or
128 food products, to revoke or cancel the dairy manufacturer's license of any person or
129 farmstead manufacturing plant doing business in this state who violates the laws of this
130 state or the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.
131 (b) The enforcement methods authorized by this article shall be cumulative of those
132 otherwise provided by law, and the same are not superseded by this article.
H. B. 228
- 6 -

LC 44 2892
133 26-2-513.
134 (a) Any person operating under this article shall furnish, upon the request of the
135 Commissioner, such data and statistics as he or she may require.
136 (b) All persons operating under this article shall keep complete and accurate records of
137 their operations, and the Commissioner shall have free access to all such records.
138 26-2-514.
139 Any person, firm, or corporation subject to this article and the other laws of this state who
140 violates any provision of this article or any valid rules or regulations made thereunder may
141 be enjoined from such continued violation. The Commissioner is authorized to apply for,
142 and for cause shown the superior court having jurisdiction of the defendant in any such
143 action may grant, injunctive relief by interlocutory injunction, permanent injunction, or
144 temporary restraining order, as the circumstances may warrant. The proceeding may be
145 maintained notwithstanding the pendency of any civil action and notwithstanding the
146 pendency of or conviction in a criminal proceeding arising from the same transaction.
147 Such action may be maintained without bond. The purpose of this Code section is to create
148 a statutory cause of action by way of injunction, and the Commissioner is authorized to
149 bring such proceedings in the same form and manner and in the same court as other
150 equitable proceedings may be brought. This remedy is not exclusive but is cumulative of
151 other remedies afforded to protect the consuming public from unwholesome products
152 which are economic frauds.
153 26-2-515.
154 Any person who violates any provision this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor."
155 SECTION 3.
156 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 228
- 7 -